Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB209.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1601(a.1) of the act of May 1, 1933 (P.L.103, No.69), known as The Second Class Township Code, is amended to read:Section 1601. Ordinances.--* * *(a.1) If the full text is not included, a copy shall be supplied to the publishing newspaper when the notice is published, and an attested copy shall be filed within thirty days after enactment in the county law library or other county office designated by the county commissioners, who may impose a fee no greater than that necessary to cover the actual costs of storing the ordinances. Filing with the county may be completed by the submission of an electronic copy of the ordinance through a method available, in the sole discretion of the county, to 12345678910111213141516171819 permit receipt by the office storing municipal ordinances. Upon request by the township, the county shall notify the township of the method by which electronic copies may be submitted. The county may store the ordinance electronically, provided that the public is able to access the electronically stored township ordinances during regular business hours at the office or at a remote location. The township shall retain a printed copy of the e-mail and ordinance as transmitted. The date of such filing shall not affect the effective date of the ordinance, the validity of the process of the enactment or adoption of the ordinance; nor shall a failure to record within the time provided be deemed a defect in the process of the enactment or adoption of such ordinance. If substantial amendments are made in the proposed ordinance, before voting upon enactment, the board of supervisors shall at least ten days before enactment readvertise in one newspaper of general circulation in the township a brief summary setting forth all the provisions in reasonable detail, together with a summary of the amendments. Ordinances shall be recorded in the ordinance book of the township and are effective [five days] immediately after adoption unless a [date later than five days after adoption] later date is stated in the ordinance.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0209PN0157 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324